California statutes. Elections Code
Not less than 73 days, and not more than 90 days, before the general election, the Secretary of State shall notify each candidate for partisan office and voter-nominated office of the names, addresses, offices, ballot designations, and party preferences of all other persons whose names are to appear on the ballot for the same office at the general election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 560, Sec. 7.   (AB 1417)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8148.

Not less than 68 days before the general election, the Secretary of State shall deliver to the appropriate county elections official a certificate showing:

(a) The name of every person entitled to receive votes within that county at the general election who has received the nomination as a candidate for public office pursuant to this chapter, the designation of the public office for which he or she has been nominated, and, if applicable, the ballot designation specified in accordance with Section 13107.

(b) For each nominee for a partisan office, the name of the party that has nominated him or her.

(c) For each nominee
 for a voter-nominated office, the designation made by the candidate pursuant to Section 8002.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 23.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8149.

The Secretary of State shall certify and transmit the list of candidates for each office according to Assembly districts, in the order of arrangement prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13. In the case of each county containing more than one Assembly district, he or she shall transmit separate lists for each Assembly district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8150.

The certificate of the Secretary of State showing candidates nominated or selected at a primary election, and justices of the Supreme Court and courts of appeal to appear on the general elections ballot, shall be in a form prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 1, Sec. 30.   (SB 6)   Effective January 1, 2010.   Operative January 1, 2011, pursuant to Sec. 67 of Ch. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. June 2, 2026, Statewide Direct Primary Election [8160. - 8166.]

8160.

This chapter applies only to the June 2, 2026, statewide direct primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8166.)
-------------------------------------------

8161.

For purposes of this chapter, “statewide direct primary election” means the June 2, 2026, statewide direct primary election.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8166.)
-------------------------------------------

8162.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 8106, forms for securing signatures on an in-lieu-filing-fee petition shall be made available beginning December 19, 2025.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 8106, the elections official shall reduce the required number of signatures on an in-lieu-filing-fee petition by the same proportion as the reduction in the number of days for the candidate to collect signatures on such a petition compared to the number of days for a candidate to collect signatures on a petition, as provided by subdivision (b) of Section 8106.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8166.)
-------------------------------------------

8163.

Not later than December 19, 2025, the Secretary of State shall determine whether it is feasible to include the number of voters, by party preferences, in each congressional district in the state in the statewide list compiled by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2187 with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 154th day before the statewide direct primary election in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2187, and shall publicly announce that determination. If the Secretary of State determines that it is not feasible to include that information, all of the following apply:

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 2187, the information provided by the county elections official
 pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2187 is not required to include the number of voters by political party preferences in congressional districts located in whole or in part within the county.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2187, the statewide list compiled by the Secretary of State pursuant to that subdivision with respect to all voters who are registered voters on the 154th day before the statewide direct primary election shall not include the number of voters, by party preferences, in each congressional district in the state.

(c) (1) The Secretary of State shall prepare a supplemental statewide list showing the number of voters, by party preference, in the state and in each county, city, supervisorial district, Assembly district, Senate district, and congressional district in the state with respect to all voters who are
 registered voters on a date specified by the Secretary of State. The date specified by the Secretary of State shall be as soon as is feasible, as determined by the Secretary of State, but not later than the 88th day before the statewide direct primary election. The Secretary of State shall compile this list within 30 days of receiving the information specified in paragraph (2). A copy of this list shall be made available, upon request, to any elector in this state.

(2) For the purpose of preparing the supplemental statewide list required by paragraph (1), each county elections official shall prepare the information referenced in subdivision (a) of Section 2187 and provide notice to the Secretary of State by a date specified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8166.)
-------------------------------------------

8164.

Not later than the date that forms for securing signatures on an in-lieu-filing-fee petition are made available in accordance with Section 8162, the Secretary of State shall prepare a calendar of key election dates and deadlines and requirements for the nomination and election of candidates pursuant to California law, including this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8166.)
-------------------------------------------

8165.

(a) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 13107, a candidate for the office of Representative in Congress shall not choose the word “incumbent” as a designation to appear on the ballot. This subdivision shall not be construed to prevent a candidate from choosing a designation of the elective office which the candidate holds at the time of filing the nomination documents, to which the candidate was elected by vote of the people in accordance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 13107.

(b) (1) Section 8022, as it pertains to the office of Representative in Congress, shall not be operative.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 8020 or
 any other law, a person shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the statewide direct primary election to file nomination documents for the office of Representative in Congress, if either of the following is true:

(A) No person who currently holds the office of Representative in Congress delivered nomination documents for that district by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the statewide direct primary election.

(B) Every person who currently holds the office of Representative in Congress who delivered nomination documents for that district by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the statewide direct primary election also withdrew those nomination documents before 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the statewide direct primary election.

(c) This section shall become operative only if Assembly Constitutional Amendment 8 of the
 2025–26 Regular Session is approved by the voters and takes effect, and subdivision (b) of Section 4 of Article XXI of the California Constitution, as added by that constitutional amendment, becomes operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 8166.)
-------------------------------------------

8166.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 97, Sec. 1.   (SB 280)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 1.5, commencing with Section 8160.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Judicial Officers [8200. - 8228.]



  ARTICLE 1. Distinguishing Number on Ballot [8200. - 8204.]

8200.

In any election at which two or more judges or justices of any court are to be voted for or elected for the same term, it shall be deemed that there are as many separate judicial offices to be filled as there are judges or justices of the court to be elected. Each separate office shall be designated by a distinguishing number not greater than the total number of the offices. The designation shall remain the same for all purposes of both primary and general election and shall be used on all nomination papers, certificates of nomination, ballots, certificates of election, and all election papers referring to the office. After election and the issuance of the certificates of election, the designating number shall have no further significance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8201.

(a) A declaration of candidacy for election or a nomination by the Governor, made pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 16 of Article VI of the California Constitution, shall be filed with the officer charged with the duty of certifying nominations for publication in the official ballot.

(b) No candidate described in subdivision (a) shall be required to state his or her residential address on the declaration of candidacy. However, in cases where the candidate does not state his or her residential address on the declaration of candidacy, the elections official shall verify whether his or her address is within the appropriate political subdivision and add the notation “verified” where appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 932, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

8202.

The numerically designated offices shall be grouped and arranged on all ballots in numerical order. No person may be a candidate nor have his or her name printed upon any ballot as a candidate for any numerically designated office other than the one indicated by him or her in his or her declaration of intention to become a candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 466, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

8203.

(a) In any county in which only the incumbent has filed nomination papers for the office of superior court judge, his or her name shall not appear on the ballot unless there is filed with the elections official, within 10 days after the final date for filing nomination papers for the office, a petition indicating that a write-in campaign will be conducted for the office and signed by at least 0.1 percent of the registered voters qualified to vote with respect to the office, provided that the petition shall contain at least 100 signatures but need not contain more than 600 signatures.

(b) If a petition indicating that a write-in campaign will be conducted for the office at the general
 election, signed by the number of registered voters qualified to vote with respect to the office specified in subdivision (a), is filed with the elections official not less than 83 days before the general election, the name of the incumbent shall be placed on the general election ballot if it has not appeared on the direct primary election ballot.

(c) If, in conformity with this section, the name of the incumbent does not appear either on the primary ballot or general election ballot, the elections official, on the day of the general election, shall declare the incumbent reelected. Certificates of election specified in Section 15401 or 15504 shall not be issued to a person reelected pursuant to this section before the day of the general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   (AB 362)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8204.

(a) If an incumbent of a judicial office dies on or before the last day prescribed for the filing of nomination papers, or files a declaration of intention but for any reason fails to file his or her nomination papers by the last day prescribed for the filing of the papers, an additional five days shall be allowed for the filing of nomination papers for the office.

(b) Any person other than the person who was the incumbent, if otherwise qualified, may file nomination papers for the office during the extended period, notwithstanding that he or she has not filed a written and signed declaration of intention to become a candidate for the office as provided in Sections 8023 and 8201.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 466, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Adoption of Subdivision (d) of Section 16 of Article VI of the California Constitution [8220. - 8228.]

8220.

The voters of any county may adopt subdivision (d) of Section 16 of Article VI of the Constitution of this state as applicable to the judge of the superior court of the county if a majority of the voters of the county, voting on the question of its adoption, vote in favor thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8221.

Subdivision (d) of Section 16 of Article VI may be adopted:

(a) In pursuance of an ordinance or resolution adopted by the board of supervisors of the county, declaring that the public interest requires the submission at an election of the proposal to adopt the provisions as applicable to the judge of the superior court of the county.

(b) In pursuance of a petition of voters of the county as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8222.

The petition shall state the name and address of a person to whom notice of the insufficiency of the petition shall be sent in the event the petition has not the required number of signatures of voters signed thereto.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8223.

The petition shall be signed by 10 percent of the voters of the county, computed upon the total number of votes cast therein for all candidates for Governor at the last preceding gubernatorial election, and it shall pray for the adoption of the provisions as applicable to the judge of the superior court of the county. The petition shall be filed in the office of the county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8224.

Within 20 days after the filing of the petition, the county elections official shall examine it and ascertain from the record of the registration of the voters of the county whether the petition is signed by the requisite number. If needed by the county elections official, the board of supervisors shall authorize him or her to employ persons to assist him or her in the work of examining the petition, and the board shall provide for their compensation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8225.

Upon the completion of his or her examination, the elections official shall forthwith attach to the petition his or her certificate, duly dated, showing the results of his or her examination. If the certificate shows that the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters, he or she shall immediately present the petition to the board of supervisors if it is in session, otherwise at its next meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8226.

If it appears by the certificate that the petition has not the required number of signatures, the elections official shall so notify the person designated as the person to whom notification of the insufficiency of the petition is to be sent. The petitioners shall have 30 days from and after the date of receiving the notice of insufficiency to present and file a supplement bearing additional signatures. Upon the receipt of the supplement, the elections official shall proceed forthwith to examine it. He or she shall complete his or her examination within 10 days from the date of its receipt by him or her. If it appears that the additional signatures and those which have not been legally rejected upon the original petition total the requisite number, the county elections official shall forthwith attach to the petition his certificate, duly dated, showing that the petition has been signed by the requisite number of voters, and shall immediately present it to the board of supervisors if it is in session, otherwise at its next meeting.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8227.

Upon the adoption of the ordinance or resolution or the presentation of a petition, the board of supervisors shall submit the proposal to the voters at the next succeeding general election, presidential primary, or countywide special election, occurring subsequent to 90 days after the adoption of the ordinance or resolution or the presentation of the petition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8228.

If the proposal is approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon, the board of supervisors shall file a certificate, signed by the chairman of the board and duly dated, with the Secretary of State, reciting that the proposal to adopt subdivision (d) of Section 16 of Article VI of the California Constitution as applicable to the judge of the superior court of the county was approved by a majority of the votes cast thereon at the election. Upon the filing of the certificate the provisions of subdivision (d) of Section 16 of the California Constitution shall thereupon be applicable to the judge of the superior court of that county, and effective as to all vacancies in the office occurring after the date of filing of the certificate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. INDEPENDENT NOMINATIONS [8300. - 8550.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [8300. - 8304.]

8300.

A candidate for a partisan office, including that of presidential elector, may be nominated subsequent to, or by other means than, a primary election pursuant to this chapter. A candidate for nonpartisan office or for voter-nominated office may be nominated subsequent to, or by other means than, a primary election pursuant to this chapter only if a candidate was not nominated or elected at the primary election for that office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 3, Sec. 24.   (AB 1413)   Effective February 10, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

8301.

A candidate for whom a nomination paper has been filed as a partisan candidate at a primary election, and who is defeated for his or her party nomination at the primary election, is ineligible for nomination as an independent candidate.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8302.

For the purposes of this chapter, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 8000) of Part 1, and Part 4 (commencing with Section 8800), so far as consistent with this chapter, shall apply to all offices for which nominations are made at the presidential primary and direct primary elections, as well as to elections for any other office to which those provisions would not ordinarily apply.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8303.

Whenever a group of candidates for presidential electors, equal in number to the number of presidential electors to which this state is entitled, files a nomination paper with the Secretary of State pursuant to this chapter, the nomination paper may contain the name of the candidate for President of the United States and the name of the candidate for Vice President of the United States for whom all of those candidates for presidential electors pledge themselves to vote.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8304.

When a group of candidates for presidential electors designates the presidential and vice presidential candidates for whom all of the group pledge themselves to vote, the names of the presidential candidate and vice presidential candidate designated by that group shall be printed on the ballot pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 13100) of Division 13.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Nomination Papers [8400. - 8409.]

8400.

Nomination papers for a statewide office for which the candidate is to be nominated shall be signed by voters of the state equal to not less in number than 1 percent of the entire number of registered voters of the state at the time of the close of registration prior to the preceding general election. Nomination papers for an office, other than a statewide office, shall be signed by the voters of the area for which the candidate is to be nominated, not less in number than 3 percent of the entire number of registered voters in the area at the time of the close of
 registration prior to the preceding general election. Nomination papers for Representative in Congress, State Senator or Assembly Member, to be voted for at a special election to fill a vacancy, shall be signed by voters in the district not less in number than 500 or 1 percent of the entire vote cast in the area at the preceding general election, whichever is less, nor more than 1,000.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8401.

(a) Upon receiving the nomination paper if, from the examination of such pursuant to Section 8400, more than 500 signatures have been signed on the nomination paper petition, the elections official may use a random sampling technique for verification of signatures. The random sample of signatures to be verified shall be drawn in such a manner that every signature filed with the elections official shall be given an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. The random sampling shall include an examination of at least 500 or 5 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater.

(b) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures
 is within 90 to 110 percent of the number of signatures of qualified voters needed to declare the nomination paper sufficient, the elections official shall examine and verify each signature filed.

(c) In determining from the records of registration, what number of valid signatures are signed on the nomination paper, the elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the
 facsimiles is permitted by law.

(d) The elections official shall attach to the nomination paper, a certificate showing the result of this examination, and shall notify the candidate of either the sufficiency or insufficiency of the nomination paper.

(e) If the nomination paper is found insufficient, no action shall be taken on the nomination paper. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures, shall not preclude the submission later of an entirely new nomination paper to the same effect.

(f) If the nomination paper is found to be sufficient, the elections official shall certify the results of the examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 75.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

8402.

When a nomination paper or sections of a nomination paper have been received which contain the number of valid signatures required in Section 8400, the officer with whom those papers are required to be left shall not accept additional sections of the nomination paper for the candidate named in it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8403.

(a) (1) Nomination papers shall be prepared, circulated, signed, and delivered to the county elections official for examination no earlier than 148 days before the election and no later than 5 p.m. 88 days before the election.

(2) For offices for which no filing fee is required, nomination papers shall be prepared, circulated, signed, and delivered to the county elections official for examination no earlier than 193 days before the election and no later than
 5 p.m. 88 days before the election.

(b) All nomination documents that are required to be filed in the office of the Secretary of State shall, within 24 days after being left with the county elections official in compliance with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), be forwarded by the county elections official to the Secretary of State, who shall receive and file them.

(c) If the total number of signatures submitted to a county elections official for an office entirely within that county does not equal the number of signatures needed to qualify the candidate, the county elections official shall declare the petition void and is not required to verify the signatures. If the district falls within two or more counties, the county elections official shall within two working days report in writing to the Secretary of State the total number of signatures submitted.

(d) If the Secretary of State finds that the total number of signatures submitted in the district or state is less than the minimum number required to qualify the candidate he or she shall within one working day notify in writing the counties involved that they need not verify the signatures.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8404.

Each signer of a nomination paper shall sign but one paper for the same office, except that in case two or more persons are to be elected to the same office at the same election, an elector may sign the nomination papers of as many persons as there are persons to be elected to the office, and that act on the part of an elector shall not be deemed in conflict with the signer’s statement prescribed in this chapter.

The signer shall state his or her place of residence, giving his or her street and number, if
 any.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8405.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if an independent candidate submits an in-lieu-filing-fee petition pursuant to Section 8106, the county elections official, upon the request of the candidate, shall accept all valid signatures appearing on the candidate’s in-lieu-filing-fee petition toward the number of signatures required to be submitted on an in-lieu-filing-fee petition and on a nomination paper.

If the in-lieu-filing-fee petition does not contain the requisite number of signatures required under
 Section 8400, the candidate shall be entitled to file, within the time period allowed for filing nomination papers, a nomination paper in order to obtain the requisite number of valid signatures required to be submitted to the elections official pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8406.

Any nomination paper may be presented in sections, but each section shall contain the name of the candidate and the name of the office for which the candidate is proposed for nomination. Each section shall bear the name of the county for which it is circulated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 562, Sec. 5.   (AB 1829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

8407.

The affidavit of any circulator obtaining signatures under this chapter shall be verified free of charge by any officer authorized to administer oaths.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8408.

A verified nomination paper is prima facie evidence that the signatures to it are genuine and that the persons signing it are voters unless it is otherwise proven by comparison of the signatures with the affidavits of registration in the office of the county elections official.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8409.

Each candidate or group of candidates shall submit a nomination paper that shall be substantially in the following form:County of _______.Nomination paper of ______, candidate for the office of _______.State of CaliforniaCounty of ⎱
 ⎰ss.SIGNER’S STATEMENTI, undersigned, am a voter of the County of ______, State of California. I hereby nominate __________, who resides at No. ______, ________ Street, City of ________, County of ______, State of California, as a candidate for the office of _______ to be voted for at the election to be held on the ______ day of ______, 20___. I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidate for the same office. Number Signature Printed Name Residence 1. 2. 3. 4. 5. etc. CIRCULATOR’S AFFIDAVITI, ________, solemnly swear (or affirm) all of the following:1.That I am 18 years of age or older.2.That my residence address, including street and number, is
.
 [If no street or number exists, a designation of my residence adequate to readily ascertain its location is
.]3.That I
 secured signatures in the County of ______ to the nomination paper of ________ as candidate for the office of ______; that the signatures were obtained between _______, 20__, and ________, 20__; that I saw all the signatures on this section of the nomination paper being signed and that, to the best of my information and belief, each signature is the genuine signature of the person whose name it purports to be.(Signed) CirculatorSubscribed and sworn to before me this ______ day of ______, 20__.(SEAL)Notary Public (or other official)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 16.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Circulators [8451. - 8454.]

8451.

Circulators shall meet the requirements of Section 102.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 17.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

8452.

A county elections official or a deputy county elections official may not circulate nomination papers, and circulators shall not obtain signatures within 100 feet of any election booth or polling place. This section does not prohibit a county elections official or a deputy county elections official from circulating his or her own nomination papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 228, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

8454.

(a) Circulators obtaining signatures to the nomination paper of any candidate may, at any time not more than 148 nor less than 88 days prior to the election, obtain signatures to the nomination paper of the candidate.

(b) Circulators obtaining signatures to the nomination paper of any candidate for presidential elector may, at any time not more than 193 nor less than 88 days prior to the election, obtain signatures to the nomination paper of the candidate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Arrangement and Examination of Nomination Papers [8500. - 8504.]

8500.

Each section of a nomination paper, after being verified, shall be returned by the circulator who circulated it to the candidate. All the sections circulated in any area shall be collected by the candidate and shall be arranged for filing and examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8501.

For all nominations of candidates to be voted for in more than one county or throughout the state, the nomination papers, properly assembled, may be fastened together by counties, but in no case shall nomination papers signed by voters of different counties be fastened together.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

Nomination papers shall be left with the county elections official for examination and filed by him or her pursuant to the time limitations set forth in Section 8403.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8503.

The county elections official shall examine all nomination papers left with him or her for filing or for examination and shall disregard and mark “not sufficient” any name appearing on them which does not appear in the same handwriting on an affidavit of registration in his or her office made on or before the date when the name was signed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8504.

Within 24 days after any nomination papers are left for examination, the county elections official shall examine them and prepare a certificate reciting that he or she has examined them, and stating the number of names which have not been marked “not sufficient.” The certificate shall be forwarded immediately to the Secretary of State for those offices that are certified by the Secretary of State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Affidavit of Candidate [8550. - 8550.]

8550.

(a) At least 88 days prior to the election, each candidate shall leave with the officer with whom the candidate’s nomination papers are required to be left, a declaration of candidacy which states all of the following:

(1) The candidate’s residence, with street and number, if any.

(2) That the candidate is a voter in the precinct in which the candidate resides.

(3) The name of the office
 sought by the candidate.

(4) That the candidate will not withdraw as a candidate before the election.

(5) That, if elected, the candidate will qualify for the office.

(b) A declaration of candidacy described in subdivision (a) for the office of presidential elector shall be accompanied by a declaration of an individual who will serve as an alternate elector if the elector vacates the elector’s office. The accompanying declaration shall state that the individual is an alternate to the candidate for the office of presidential elector and shall contain the information described in paragraphs (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (a).

(c) The
 name of a candidate shall not be placed on the ballot unless the declaration of candidacy provided for in this section has been properly filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 216, Sec. 13.   (SB 103)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. WRITE-IN CANDIDATES [8600. - 8700.]



  CHAPTER 1. General [8600. - 8606.]

8600.

(a) Every person who desires to be a write-in candidate and have their name as written on the ballot of an election counted for a particular office shall file both of the following:

(1) A statement of write-in candidacy that contains the following information:

(A) Candidate’s name.

(B) Residence address.

(C) A declaration stating that
 they are a write-in candidate.

(D) The title of the office for which they are running.

(E) The party nomination which they seek, if running in a partisan primary election.

(F) The date of the election.

(G) A certification of the candidate’s complete voter registration and party affiliation/preference history for the
 preceding 10 years, or for as long as they have been eligible to vote in the state if less than 10 years, if running for a voter-nominated office.

(H) For any of the offices described in Section 13.5, a statement that the candidate meets the statutory and constitutional requirements for that office as described in that section.

(2) The requisite number of signatures on the nomination papers, if any, required pursuant to Sections 8062, 10220, and 10510, or, in the case of a special district not subject to the Uniform District Election Law (Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10), the number of signatures required by the principal act of the district.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person may not be a write-in candidate at the general election for a voter-nominated office.

(c) A write-in candidate shall have their residence address, telephone number, and email address appearing on the affidavit of registration made confidential in accordance with the terms and conditions of Section 2166.9. If a candidate does not state the candidate’s residence address on the statement of write-in candidacy, the elections official shall verify whether the candidate’s address is within the appropriate political subdivision and add the notation “verified” where appropriate on the declaration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 300, Sec. 5.   (AB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

8601.

The statement and nomination papers shall be available on the 57th day prior to the election for which the candidate is filing as a write-in candidate, and shall be delivered to the elections official responsible for the conduct of the election no later than the 14th day prior to the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8602.

The nomination papers for a write-in candidate shall be substantially in the same form as set forth in Section 8041.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 790, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

8603.

Signers of nomination papers for write-in candidates shall be voters in the district or political subdivision in which the candidate is to be voted on. In addition, if the candidate is seeking a party nomination for an office, the signers shall also be affiliated with the party whose nomination is sought.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8604.

No fee or charge shall be required of a write-in candidate except in the case of a candidate for city office, as provided in Section 10228.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

8605.
